pt-BR: Sistema de tensionamento da cabeça da conga: Afinação com garra estendida/longa; Garras de afinação rápida; Afinação com garra tradicional; Outro
it: Sistema di tensionamento della testa della conga: Accordatura con tiranti lunghi/estesi; Tiranti ad accordatura rapida; Accordatura con tiranti tradizionali; Altro
th: ระบบปรับความตึงหัวคองก้า: ลักตั้งเสียงแบบขยาย/ยาว; ลักตั้งเสียงแบบปรับเร็ว; ลักตั้งเสียงแบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Sistema de tensionamento da cabeça do conga: Afinação de tensores longos/estendidos; Tensores de afinação rápida; Afinação de tensores tradicional; Outro
tr: Conga davul başlığı gerdirme sistemi: Uzatılmış/uzun lug akordu; Hızlı akort lugları; Geleneksel lug akordu; Diğer
pl: System napinania membrany kongi: Przedłużone/długie śruby napinające; Śruby szybkiego strojenia; Tradycyjne śruby napinające; Inne
cs: Systém napínání blány congy: Ladění s prodlouženými/dlouhými mušlemi; Rychloupínací mušle; Tradiční ladění pomocí mušlí; Jiné
nl: Conga velspansysteem: Stemming met verlengde/lange spanbouten; Quick-tune spanbouten; Traditionele stemming met spanbouten; Overig
lt-LT: Kongos membranos įtempimo sistema: Pailgintų / ilgų tvirtinimo detalių derinimas; Greito derinimo tvirtinimo detalės; Tradicinis tvirtinimo detalių derinimas; Kita
es: Sistema de tensado de cabezales de conga: Afinación con tensores extendidos/largos; Tensores de afinación rápida; Afinación con tensores tradicional; Otro
en: Conga head tensioning system: Extended/long lug tuning; Quick-tune lugs; Traditional lug tuning; Other
zh-TW: 康加鼓鼓皮張力系統: 加長型/長鼓耳調音; 快調鼓耳; 傳統鼓耳調音; 其他
zh-CN: 康加鼓鼓面张紧系统: 加长/长鼓耳调音; 快速调音鼓耳; 传统鼓耳调音; 其他
hr-HR: Sustav za zatezanje glave Conge: Ugađanje s produženim/dugim zatezačima; Zatezači za brzo ugađanje; Tradicionalno ugađanje zatezačima; Ostalo
bg-BG: Система за обтягане на кожата на конга: Настройване с удължени/дълги лъгове; Бързо настройващи се лъгове; Традиционно настройване с лъгове; Друга
ru: Система натяжения мембраны конги: Настройка удлиненными лагами; Лаги быстрой настройки; Традиционная настройка лагами; Другое
nb: Conga-hodestrammingssystem: Lange/utvidede spennskruer; Hurtigstemte spennskruer; Tradisjonelle spennskruer; Annet
sv: Spännsystem för congahuvud: Förlängd/lång stämskruv; Snabbstämskruvar; Traditionell stämskruv; Annat
ro-RO: Sistem de tensionare a capului de conga: Acordaj cu șuruburi extinse/lungi; Șuruburi cu acordaj rapid; Acordaj tradițional cu șuruburi; Altele
el: Σύστημα τάνυσης κεφαλής Conga: Κούρδισμα με εκτεταμένα/μακριά κλειδιά; Κλειδιά γρήγορου κουρδίσματος; Παραδοσιακό κούρδισμα με κλειδιά; Άλλο
ja: コンガヘッドテンションシステム: エクステンデッド / ロングラグチューニング; クイックチューンラグ; トラディショナルラグチューニング; その他
sl-SI: Sistem za napenjanje glave conga bobna: Uglaševanje s podaljšanimi/dolgimi vijaki; Vijaki za hitro uglaševanje; Tradicionalno uglaševanje z vijaki; Drugo
de: Spannsystem des Congafells: Verlängerte/lange Spannböckchen; Schnellspannböckchen; Traditionelle Spannböckchen; Sonstige
ko: 콩가 헤드 장력 조절 방식: 확장/롱 러그 튜닝; 퀵 튠 러그; 전통적인 러그 튜닝; 기타
hu: Kongafej feszítő rendszere: Meghosszabbított/hosszú babás hangolás; Gyorshangoló babák; Hagyományos babás hangolás; Egyéb
da: System til spænding af conga-skind: Stemning med forlængede/lange spændehuse; Hurtigt stemmende spændehuse; Traditionel stemning med spændehuse; Andet
sk-SK: Systém napínania hlavy bicích nástrojov konga: Ladenie s predĺženými/dlhými skrutkami; Rýchloladiace skrutky; Tradičné ladenie skrutkami; Iné
fr: Système de tension de la peau de conga: Tension à tirants longs/allongés; Tirants à réglage rapide; Tension à tirants traditionnelle; Autre
vi: Hệ thống căng mặt trống conga: Chỉnh âm bằng ngàm dài/kéo dài; Ngàm chỉnh nhanh; Chỉnh âm bằng ngàm truyền thống; Khác
fi: Congarummun kalvon kiristysjärjestelmä: Pitkä viritysruuvi; Pikasäädettävät viritysruuvit; Perinteinen ruuviviritys; Muu